Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 5. County Commissioners

Cross references. —

As to county commissioners in relation to organization of new counties, see §§

18-1-301

to

18-1-320

.

As to general provisions relating to county officers, see §§

18-3-101

to

18-3-112

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, etc. §§ 139 to 192, 231 to 336.

20 C.J.S. Counties §§ 34 to 142.

§ 18-3-501.
Composition; election for increasing the number; term; quorum; election for districting; procedures.

Each board of county commissioners shall consist of three (3) qualified electors who shall be elected in the following manner: at the general election held in the year 1980 and every fourth year thereafter, there shall be elected one (1) commissioner for a term of four (4) years and at the general election held in the year of 1978 and every fourth year thereafter there shall be elected two (2) commissioners for a term of four (4) years each. Any two (2) members of the board constitute a quorum and are competent to act. In addition to the other residency requirements imposed by this section, each county commissioner shall be a resident of the county in which the county commissioner serves, beginning on the first day of the term and through the last day of the term for which the county commissioner serves.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, any county may increase the membership of its board of county commissioners from three (3) to five (5) members if a proposition for the increase is submitted to a vote of the qualified electors of the county and a majority of those casting their ballots vote in favor of the increase. Additional offices created under this subsection shall be filled at the general election next following the election at which the increase was approved. At that general election, not more than one (1) commissioner shall be elected for a term of two (2) years, and the election ballots shall so state. Each term shall otherwise be four (4) years.

The proposition to increase the membership of the board of county commissioners shall be at the expense of the county and be submitted to the electors of the county upon receipt by the county clerk of a petition requesting the election signed by at least ten percent (10%) of the qualified electors of the county. To be counted the electors shall be registered voters when the completed petition is submitted for verification. The number of electors required shall be determined by the number of votes cast at the last general election. The election shall be at the direction and under the supervision of the county clerk. The petition shall be in substantially the following form:

This petition is for the purpose of requesting an election to increase the membership of the board of county commissioners from three (3) to five (5) members. If a proposition for the increase is submitted to a vote of the qualified electors of the county and a majority of those casting their ballots vote in favor of the increase, the additional offices created shall be filled at the general election held in (year). The eligible registered electors supporting the petition and numbering not less than ten percent (10%) of the total number of votes cast at the last general election in the county for which this petition is filed, are as follows: (Signature) (Printed Name) (Residence Address) (Date) VERIFICATION OF CIRCULATORS I, do hereby certify that I am a circulator of this petition, and I solely and personally circulated this petition, that all the signatures appearing herein were made in my presence from (month) (day), (year) through (month) (day), (year), and to the best of my knowledge and belief such signatures are those of the persons whose names they purport to be. (Signature) (Residence Address)

Click to view

The proposition may be submitted at any general election . A notice of election shall be given in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation published in the county wherein the election is to be held and shall specify the object of the election. The notice shall be published at least once each week for a thirty (30) day period preceding the election. At the election the ballots shall contain the words “for increasing the membership of the board of county commissioners from three (3) to five (5) members”, and “against increasing the membership of the board of county commissioners from three (3) to five (5) members”.

If a county votes to increase the membership of its board of county commissioners under subsection (b) of this section, three (3) members of the board constitute a quorum and are competent to act.

Any county may decrease the membership of its board of county commissioners from five (5) to three (3) members in the same petition and proposition process as an increase under subsections (b) and (c) of this section. The vote to decrease membership shall be in the general election preceding the election of three (3) commissioners. Notice of the election shall be given as provided in subsection (d) of this section.

Any county in which the electors vote to increase the number of county commissioners from three (3) to five (5) as provided by this section may be divided into five (5) districts if a proposition for districting is submitted to a vote of the qualified electorate of the county and a majority of those casting their ballots vote in favor of the districting. The proposition for districting shall be submitted to a vote in the manner provided by subsections (c) and (d) of this section. At the election, the ballot shall contain the words “for dividing the county into five (5) county commissioner election districts” and “against dividing the county into five (5) county commissioner election districts”. The proposition to increase the number of county commissioners and the proposition for districting may appear on the ballot at the same general election, however the ballots shall state that the proposition for districting is contingent upon approval of the proposition to increase the number of commissioners. The petition required by subsection (c) of this section may contain both the proposition to increase the number of commissioners and the proposition for districting, or the propositions may be circulated and submitted on separate petitions. If the proposition for districting is not approved, the commissioners shall represent the county on at-large basis.

If the proposition for districting is approved, the board of county commissioners shall devise a districting plan dividing the county into districts as nearly equal in population as practicable considering the geographic, economic and social characteristics of the county. The districting plan shall be made before March 1 next following the election at which the proposition for districting is approved and shall be effective as of March 1 the following year. The districting plan may provide that any commissioner elected after the effective date of the districting plan shall reside in and represent the district from which he is elected by the electors of that district, and, beginning January 1, 2012, that commissioners may serve at large or that district representation may be apportioned in any combination of single member, multi-member and at large representation, provided that in all cases commissioners represent a population as nearly equal as is practicable considering the geographic, economic and social characteristics of the county. Commissioners in office on the effective date of the districting plan shall serve the county at large until the regular expiration of their term. The districting plan shall designate which districts shall elect county commissioners in the general election next following the effective date of the districting plan. In any county in which the voters approved increasing the number of commissioners and districting at the same election, the districting plan shall also designate which district shall elect a county commissioner at the next general election for a term of two (2) years, as provided by subsection (b) of this section. The ballot shall state the term in the designated district to be for two (2) years. Thereafter, all terms shall be four (4) years.

Appeals from the actions of the boards of county commissioners shall be as provided by law.

If required to do so pursuant to a final court order or changes in population affecting the constitutionality of a current districting plan, the board of county commissioners may by resolution devise a districting or redistricting plan dividing the county into any number of districts necessary to meet the requirements of the court order or necessary to address the population changes. A districting or redistricting plan devised under this subsection may include single member or multi-member districts in which the candidates must reside and which are apportioned by population, districts in which candidates are elected at large, or any combination of districts in which candidates must reside and are apportioned by population or are elected at large provided that in all cases commissioners represent a population as nearly equal as is practicable considering the geographic, economic and social characteristics of the county. A districting or redistricting plan created under this subsection shall not be subject to a vote of the electors and shall go into effect after the next general election and shall be subject to the following:

An initial districting plan created under this subsection shall provide for at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the commissioners to serve an initial term of two (2) years and the remainder to serve an initial term of four (4) years. Thereafter, all terms shall be four (4) years. The terms of all commissioners serving at the time of the approval of the districting plan shall expire at the end of the current year and all offices created under this subsection shall be filled at the general election held on the effective date of the districting plan;

For a redistricting plan, commissioners in office on the effective date of the districting plan shall serve the county at large until the regular expiration of their term, if practical. The county commission shall determine whether honoring the four (4) year terms is practical.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 8; Laws 1890-91, ch. 57, § 1; 1899, ch. 11, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1056; Laws 1901, ch. 35, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1162; C.S. 1920, § 1408; R.S. 1931, § 30-601; Laws 1937, ch. 85, § 3; 1939, ch. 39, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 27-801; W.S. 1957, § 18-144; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1983, ch. 107, § 1; 1985, ch. 161, § 1; 2003, ch. 157, § 1; 2011, ch. 78, § 1; 2013 ch. 64, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 165, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (h), deleted “five (5)” preceding “districts” in the first sentence, and substituted the third sentence for the former one, which read: “Any commissioner elected after the effective date of the districting plan shall reside in and represent the district from which he is elected by the electors of that district”; and added (k).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (b) deleted “in odd-numbered years” in the second sentence, and deleted the third sentence; in (c) added the form; in (d) substituted the period for “or at an election date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

” in the first sentence; in (f) substituted “petition and proposition process” for “manner” in the first sentence, and deleted “ or at an election date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

in the second sentence; in (g) substituted the comma for “or at an election date authorized under W.S. 22-21-103” in the fourth sentence.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added the second sentence in (a).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The basic law establishing county officers and government was ch. 28, C.L. 1876.

Chapter 85, Laws 1937, was a general law relating to terms of county officers.

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 165, § 2, provides: "The residency requirements of this act shall apply to elected or appointed county officers whose terms commence on or after the effective date of this act."

Expenses. —

The county commissioners are entitled to the per diem compensation prescribed for the time actually and necessarily employed in going to and from regular and special meetings of the board. Board of Comm'rs v. Blakely, 20 Wyo. 259, 123 P. 72,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1912).

One-year contracts. —

Contract with county agricultural agent for 3 year term is unauthorized, as it would extend to time when personnel of the board of county commissioners would be changed and contracts for expenditure of county funds must be limited to 1 year. Hyde v. Board of Comm'rs, 47 Wyo. 101, 31 P.2d 75,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1934).

Propositions. —

Lawsuit was
an election contest governed by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

22-17-105

and

22-17-106

because it asked the court to (1) declare null and void
an election in which voters passed a proposition returning the size
of the county commission to three and (2) direct the county clerk
to hold an election based on a board composed of five members. The
remedy sought would have defeated the public interest in the stability
and finality of election results and could only result from a declaration
that the special election was void, which was the very essence of
an election contest. Rock v. Lankford, 2013 WY 61, 301 P.3d 1075,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2013).

Suit by three
challengers to a ballot proposition that returned the size of the
county commission to three was dismissed because the challengers
failed
to bring the contest within the time specified in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-17-105

and through the five electors required. Rock v. Lankford, 2013 WY 61, 301 P.3d 1075,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2013).

“Proposition”
to be placed on the “ballot” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

18-3-501

(size of county commission) is in fact a “ballot proposition”
under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

22-17-105

and

22-17-106

. Rock v. Lankford, 2013 WY 61, 301 P.3d 1075,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2013).

Quoted

in

Mills v. Campbell County Canvassing Bd., 707 P.2d 747,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 588

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Geringer, 297 F.3d 1108, 2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 15353 (10th Cir. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Practitioner's Guide to Valuation and Assessment Appeals of State and Local Assessed Property,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 173 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

“At-large” elections as violation of § 2 of Voting Rights Act of 1965 (42 U.S.C. § 1973), 92 ALR Fed 824.

What changes in voting practices or procedures must be precleared under § 5 of Voting Rights Act of 1965 (42 U.S.C. § 1973c) — Supreme Court cases, 146 ALR Fed 619.

§ 18-3-502.
Meetings in counties.

Each board of county commissioners shall meet at the county seat of their respective counties on the first Tuesday in each month or at such other times as may be designated by resolution of the board or when it is necessary to meet for the transaction of urgent county business.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 9; R.S. 1887, § 1800; R.S. 1899, § 1057; Laws 1903, ch. 11, § 1; 1905, ch. 84, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1163; C.S. 1920, § 1409; R.S. 1931, § 30-602; C.S. 1945, § 27-802; W.S. 1957, § 18-145; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; ch. 195, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Section 2, ch. 195, Laws 1977, would have amended provisions of W.S. 1957 similar to this section, effective January 1, 1978. However, § 1, ch. 124, Laws 1977, revised such provisions, also effective January 1, 1978.

Quoted

in

Gold v. Board of County Comm'rs, 658 P.2d 690,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 279

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

Board of Comm'rs v. Blakely, 20 Wyo. 259, 123 P. 72,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1912).

§ 18-3-503.
Length of sessions.

The board of county commissioners may sit four (4) days or longer at each regular session and two (2) days at each special session, but shall not receive any compensation for any length of time over four (4) days at regular sessions, and over two (2) days at special sessions.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 84, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 1165; C.S. 1920, § 1411; R.S. 1931, § 30-604; C.S. 1945, § 27-804; W.S. 1957, § 18-147; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Expenses. —

Commissioners are only entitled to the per diem compensation for 4 days at regular meetings and 2 days at special meetings. Board of Comm'rs v. Blakely, 20 Wyo. 259, 123 P. 72,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1912).

§ 18-3-504.
Powers and duties generally.

Each board of county commissioners may:

Make such orders concerning the property of the county as they deem expedient;

Examine and settle all accounts of receipts and expenses of the county and examine, settle and allow all accounts against the county and issue county orders therefor as provided by law;

Provide for the construction and maintenance of county buildings and insure them in the name of the county treasurer for the benefit of the county. If there are no county buildings they may provide suitable rooms for county purposes;

Apportion and order the levying of taxes as provided by law;

Represent the county, including but not limited to representing the county as a cooperating agency with special expertise in matters related to the National Environmental Policy Act and in federal land planning, implementation and management actions as provided for by W.S. 18-5-208(a), care for the county property and manage the business and concerns of the county in all cases where no provision is made by law;

Lay out, alter or discontinue any road running through the county and for such purpose acquire the use of lands therein either by gift, prescription, dedication, the exercise of the right of eminent domain, purchase or lease and perform such other duties respecting roads as required by law;

Grant licenses for keeping ferries, toll bridges and toll gates as prescribed by law;

Dissolve any board that the board of county commissioners has created under this article, W.S.

18-11-101

or under chapter 9, article 1 of this title in accordance with W.S.

18-3-525

;

By resolution, prohibit or authorize and regulate the operation of golf carts as defined by W.S. 31-5-102(a)(lxi) on public roads and streets within unincorporated areas of the county;

Perform such other duties as prescribed by law.

Each board of county commissioners may provide snow removal services on any roads within the county designated as school bus routes by the board of trustees of any school district in the county.

Each board of county commissioners shall provide for the burial or cremation of the human remains of any deceased person not receiving personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) assistance, supplemental security income or Medicaid under the Wyoming Public Assistance and Social Services Act at the time of death and without sufficient means in his own estate or other resources to provide burial or cremation. The amount paid under this subsection for burial or cremation shall not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00). Each board shall account for the county expenses incurred under this subsection during a fiscal year. By August 1 of each year, a county may request reimbursement by the department of family services for the expenses incurred under this subsection for the preceding fiscal year. The department of family services shall reimburse the expenses in accordance with W.S. 35-1-428(c).

Each board of county commissioners shall, after receiving a proposed budget for a special district or other specified entity under W.S. 18-3-402(d), ensure that the proposed budget is posted on the appropriate area of the website of the county. The posting of the budget shall include the date, time and location of a special district budget session during which final action will be taken on the proposed budget. If a proposed budget is not provided to the county clerk as required by W.S. 9-1-507(a), the board of county commissioners may not approve funding of the special district mill levy. Upon approval of the mill levy for each special district, the final approved budget shall be posted on the appropriate area of the website of the county.

All bids and contracts for capital construction projects shall be in accord with the Wyoming contractor preference laws of title 16, chapter 6.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 11; R.S. 1887, § 1801; R.S. 1899, § 1058; C.S. 1910, § 1166; Laws 1905, ch. 54, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1412; R.S. 1931, § 30-605; C.S. 1945, § 27-806; Laws 1949, ch. 137, § 1; 1951, ch. 127, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 18-149; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1978, ch. 19, § 1; 1981, ch. 174, § 2; 1986, ch. 83, § 1; 1991, ch. 235, § 1; 1997, ch. 59, § 1; ch. 196, § 1; 2012, ch. 13, § 1; 2013 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 62, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 92, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to tax levy and appropriations for predatory animal district, see §

11-6-210

.

As to powers and duties of commissioners concerning public highways, see §

24-1-104

.

As to regulation by commissioners of motor vehicle sizes and weight limits, see §

31-18-802

.

The 2012 amendment,

inserted “including but not limited to representing the county as a cooperating agency with special expertise in matters related to the National Environmental Policy Act and in federal land planning, implementation and management actions as provided for by W.S. 18-5-208(a)” in (a)(v).

Laws 2012, ch. 13 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2012.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first
2013 amendment, by ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, added (d).

The second
2013 amendment, by ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014, added (e).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in (c), added “or cremation” following “the burial” in the first sentence and added the second through fifth sentences.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (a)(viii); redesignated former (a)(viii) as (a)(x); and made a related change.

Public Assistance and Social Services Act. —

The Public Assistance and Social Services Act, referred to in subsection (c), means Laws 1937, ch. 88, §§ 1 through 48, which appeared as various sections throughout chapters 1 and 2 of title 42, before title 42 was revised in 1988. See Table of Disposition of Acts in Volume 11 and “Revision of title” note at beginning of title 42.

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 33, § 2, provides: “This act shall only apply to expenses incurred under
W.S. 18-3-504(c),
19-14-101(a) and
42-2-103(c) on or after the effective date of this act.”

For discussion of legislative and judicial history of section,

see Big Horn County Comm'rs v. Hinckley, 593 P.2d 573,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1979).

In general. —

The board is empowered generally to represent the county, and have the management of the business and concerns of the county, in all cases where no other provision is made by law. Appel v. State, 9 Wyo. 187, 61 P. 1015,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1900).

Implied contract, nonapplicability. —

County is not liable on theory of implied contract for benefits received, to contractor who constructed road upon oral authorization from individual members of board of county commissioners when same was not a county road. George W. Condon Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 56 Wyo. 38, 103 P.2d 401,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1940).

Duty to settle accounts. —

It is the duty of the board of county commissioners of each county to examine and settle all accounts of the receipts and expenses of the county, and to examine, settle, and allow all accounts chargeable against the county, and, when so settled and allowed, to issue county orders therefor. Stoll v. Board of Comm'rs, 6 Wyo. 231, 44 P. 58,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1896).

The board has power and authority to settle all accounts against the county. Houtz v. Board of Comm'rs, 11 Wyo. 152, 70 P. 840,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1902).

Acts within scope of duties. —

Approving budgets and determining compensation for the county coroner's office are statutory functions expressly within the scope of duties required of a member of a board of county commissioners. Therefore allegations of insufficient budget allocations and determination of inadequate compensation levels could not form the basis of a claim for tortious conduct against members of a board of county commissioners. Veile v. Board of County Comm'rs, 860 P.2d 1174,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1993).

Allowance of claims. —

Where county commissioners contracted with attorney to defend county in court actions, allowed claim for retainer and issued certificates of indebtedness, but later passed resolution that attorneys had not rendered service, cancelled certificates and ordered treasurer not to pay them, allowance of claim and issuance of certificates did not preclude county from contesting the claim, as certificates are merely orders on the treasurer to pay when funds available, and may be revoked and payment stopped if later a defense develops which justifies recision of contract. Treasurer in a mandamus action may plead the resolution and order of commissioners as his defense. State ex rel. Robertson Inv. Co. v. Patterson, 47 Wyo. 416, 38 P.2d 617,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1934).

County road, implied establishment. —

County road cannot be established by implication through construction thereof under invalid agreement with members of board of county commissioners, individually, when road was not of statutory width and on completion was not taken over by commissioners. George W. Condon Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 56 Wyo. 38, 103 P.2d 401,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1940).

Private roads. —

The board of county commissioners has no authority to take charge and control of a private road on behalf of the county since its powers are limited to duly established county roads. George W. Condon Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 56 Wyo. 38, 103 P.2d 401,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1940).

Acquisition by prescriptive title authorized when purpose is to lay out road, etc. —

This section authorizes boards of county commissioners to acquire title to lands by prescription in furtherance of their purpose to lay out or alter a road. Rocky Mountain Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 11, 269 P.2d 314,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1954).

Prescriptive title must be evidenced by more formal acts than public user or working of road by county. —

If a board of county commissioners relies upon the county's having obtained prescriptive title to lands within a right-of-way, or any part thereof, in order to avoid the payment of damage for their taking, the inception of such prescriptive title must be evidenced by more formal acts than the user of the road by the public or by the county's construction and maintenance of the road because, in order to be empowered to acquire such prescriptive title, the records of the county must show not only the survey plat of the road but also the proceedings of the board in relation to the road's location, establishment or alteration, thus making manifest the county's purpose to acquire the lands involved. Rocky Mountain Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 11, 269 P.2d 314,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1954).

Purpose cannot be said to exist when records fails to show necessary action. —

When county records fail to show that board has taken action necessary to legally establish a public road under §§

24-1-101

and

24-3-118

it cannot be said that the purpose to lay out or alter such road exists. Rocky Mountain Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 11, 269 P.2d 314,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1954).

Compensation. —

Principle that the commissioners of county can only act as a board in transacting county business does not necessarily control question of their per diem compensation. Board of Comm'rs v. Blakely, 20 Wyo. 259, 123 P. 72,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1912).

When mandamus lies to compel highway repair. —

Mandamus is recognized as a proper remedy to compel public officers to take care of and keep in repair public highways only when the exercise is so apparent and obvious that the refusal to act is the result of a determination not to discharge a plain duty. Board of County Comm'rs v. State, 369 P.2d 537,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1962).

Transaction of business. —

While county commissioners can only transact business as a board, this does not necessarily control question of their per diem compensation, though such principle may properly be considered in determining meaning of provision allowing commissioners per diem pay. Board of Comm'rs v. Blakely, 20 Wyo. 259, 123 P. 72,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1912).

Commissioners can only act as a board in the transaction of business of the county at the county seat, yet a commissioner in going from his home to the meeting and returning therefrom is employed in the duties of his office. Board of Comm'rs v. Blakely, 20 Wyo. 259, 123 P. 72,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1912).

Applied

in

Davis v. Board of County Comm'rs, 495 P.2d 21,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1972).

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Chaplin, 5 Wyo. 74, 37 P. 370,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1894); In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1898); Miller v. Campbell County, 722 F. Supp. 687, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11685 (D. Wyo. 1989); Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Geringer, 297 F.3d 1108,

2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 15353

(10th Cir. 2002).

§ 18-3-505.
Commissioners may authorize acceptance of negotiable paper in payment of fees; negotiable paper defined; no personal liability of county officers; date of payment; effect of dishonor; seizure.

Each board of county commissioners may except where expressly prohibited by law authorize any county officer, agent or employee to accept negotiable paper as defined in subsection (c) of this section including paper arising from the use of a lender credit card as defined in W.S. 40-14-140(a)(ix) in payment of any tax, assessment, license, permit, fee, fine or other money owing to the county or collectible by the county in behalf of the state or other unit of government, or in payment of any bail deposit or other trust deposit. Any fees assessed for processing a credit card payment may be borne by the county or person tendering payment. Any fees assessed for processing a credit card payment collected on behalf of the state shall be borne by the county or person tendering payment and not by the state. With respect to lender credit card transactions the county is entitled to promptly present all negotiable paper to the bank upon which the negotiable paper is drawn for payment without any right of setoff or defense on the part of the issuer except as follows:

Acceptance by the county of an expired card;

Acceptance of a card for payment of an amount in excess of what the issuer authorized the county to accept;

Negotiable paper that is so improperly completed that the issuer cannot identify the card holder.

Any defense, claim or action that an individual using negotiable paper or a lender credit card might have against issuers of the card shall not apply to the county, its officers, agents or employees or relieve the individual of responsibility for payment.

As used in this section “negotiable paper” means money orders, checks and drafts, including, without limitation, sales drafts and checks and drafts signed by a holder of a lender credit card issued by a bank maintaining a revolving loan account as defined in W.S.

40-14-308

, for lender credit card holders.

Any county officer, agent or employee who accepts negotiable paper pursuant to and in conformity with authorization from the board of county commissioners is not personally liable if the paper is dishonored. Any losses arising from dishonored paper shall be allocated to the respective funds for which the negotiable paper was accepted. In the event of losses from dishonored paper when the county or any of its officers are collecting funds for the state or any other level or unit of government, such losses shall be allocated to and accepted by the governmental entity for whom the collections were made.

The acceptance of negotiable paper constitutes conditional payment for the amount owing. If the paper is not dishonored the payment shall be effective on the date the paper was accepted by the county officer, agent or employee. If the paper is dishonored in the course of collection the conditional payment is of no effect and any receipt, certificate or license issued upon acceptance of the negotiable paper is void. In the event any property including motor vehicle license plates is transferred or issued by the county or any of its officers, agents or employees upon acceptance of negotiable paper, and the paper is subsequently dishonored the county may rescind the transaction and a sheriff or other law enforcement officer may without prior court proceedings seize the property. Neither the rescission nor seizure relieves the person presenting the negotiable paper from further civil or criminal liabilities as may be provided by law.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 47, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1999, ch. 22, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

made stylistic change in (c).

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo.Const. Approved March 9, 2010

§ 18-3-506.
Seal; meetings open to public; rules and regulations.

Every board of county commissioners shall have a seal and may alter it. They shall sit with open doors and all persons conducting themselves in an orderly manner may attend their meetings. They may establish rules and regulations to govern the transaction of their business.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 12; R.S. 1887, § 1802; R.S. 1899, § 1059; C.S. 1910, § 1167; C.S. 1920, § 1413; R.S. 1931, § 30-606; C.S. 1945, § 27-807; W.S. 1957, § 18-150; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to seal kept by county clerks, see § 18-3-402(a)(iv).

In general. —

All meetings of the board are public. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

Stated

in

State ex rel. State Hwy. Comm'n v. Meeker, 75 Wyo. 210, 294 P.2d 603,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1956);School Dist. No. 9 v. District Boundary Bd., 351 P.2d 106,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1960).

Cited

in

Grand Island & N.W.R.R. v. Baker, 6 Wyo. 369, 45 P. 494,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 21

, 34 L.R.A. 835 (1896).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of statutes making public proceedings open to the public, 38 ALR3d 1070, 34 ALR5th 591.

Attorney-client exception under state law making proceedings by public bodies open to the public, 34 ALR5th 591.

§ 18-3-507.
Selection of chairman.

The board of county commissioners shall at the first meeting after their election or appointment elect one (1) member chairman, who shall preside at all meetings, except in his absence any of the other members may act as temporary chairman.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 13; R.S. 1887, § 1803; R.S. 1899, § 1060; C.S. 1910, § 1168; C.S. 1920, § 1414; R.S. 1931, § 30-607; C.S. 1945, § 27-808; W.S. 1957, § 18-151; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

made stylistic change.

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Temporary chairman. —

When the chairman of the board of county commissioners is absent, the temporary chairman has authority to assist in making up the jury list. Askins v. Basil, 1933 OK 79, 162 Okla. 76, 19 P.2d 177, 1933 Okla. LEXIS 507 (Okla. 1933).

§ 18-3-508.
Chairman to administer oaths and sign orders.

The chairman of the board of county commissioners may administer oaths to any person concerning any matter submitted to the board or connected with their powers and duties, and shall sign all county orders.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 14; R.S. 1887, § 1804; R.S. 1899, § 1061; C.S. 1910, § 1169; C.S. 1920, § 1415; R.S. 1931, § 30-608; C.S. 1945, § 27-809; W.S. 1957, § 18-152; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths generally, see §

1-2-102

.

As to authority of commissioners generally to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

As to manner and form of administering oath, see §

1-2-103

.

§ 18-3-509.
Fire protection.

The board of county commissioners may provide fire protection for persons and property within the boundaries of the county, and may:

Contract to give or receive fire protection to or from one (1) or more municipal corporations or private organizations;

Provide fire protection jointly with one (1) or more municipal corporations or private organizations;

Contribute toward the support of any fire department in return for fire protection service;

Contract to participate in the emergency fire suppression account program pursuant to W.S.

36-1-401

through

36-1-404

.

The board of county commissioners of any county contracting with any municipal corporation, private organization or fire department in return for fire protection service may make an appropriation in its annual budget for the purchase of fire equipment or for the maintenance and support of the fire protection and may annually levy a tax of not more than one (1) mill on the taxable valuation of the property in the county except property within any incorporated city or town or rural fire district. The levy shall be made at the same time as other levies for county and school purposes and the proceeds from the levy shall be kept in a special fund by the county treasurer and used solely for the purpose of fire protection:

The administration and expenditures of the special fund is the responsibility of the board of county commissioners. The board of county commissioners of any county entering into a contract with any municipal corporation or private organization shall provide that the municipal corporation or private organization shall reimburse the county for the use of fire fighting equipment on such terms as the contracting parties may agree.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 70, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1982, ch. 9, § 1; 1986, ch. 51, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (b)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Counties may not regulate fireworks. —

Sections

35-10-203

,

18-3-509

,

35-9-401

through

35-9-402

, and

35-9-301

through

35-9-304

provide no grants of authority, express or implied, allowing counties to regulate fireworks. Dunnegan v. Laramie County Comm'rs, 852 P.2d 1138,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1993).